Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-335
Kit vehicle, defined.

Kit vehicle means a motor vehicle or trailer which was assembled by a person other than a generally recognized manufacturer of motor vehicles or trailers by the use of a reproduction resembling a specific manufacturer's make and model that is at least thirty years old purchased from an authorized manufacturer and accompanied by a manufacturer's statement of origin. Kit vehicle does not include glider kits.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 35;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 45.
April 12, 2018